Maryland, session 2026, HB1129.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
15–160.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1129*

HOUSE BILL 1129
(2) “PERSONAL CARE AIDE” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL WHO PROVIDES
PERSONAL ASSISTANCE SERVICES.
(3) (I) “PROVIDER AGENCY” MEANS AN ENTITY THAT PAYS A
PERSONAL CARE AIDE TO PROVIDE PERSONAL ASSISTANCE SERVICES THAT ARE
REIMBURSABLE BY THE PROGRAM UNDER COMMUNITY FIRST CHOICE,
COMMUNITY OPTIONS, COMMUNITY PERSONAL ASSISTANCE SERVICES, AND ANY
OTHER HOME– AND COMMUNITY–BASED SERVICES ADMINISTERED BY THE
DEPARTMENT.
(II) “PROVIDER AGENCY” DOES NOT MEAN AN ENTITY THAT
PAYS A PERSONAL CARE AIDE TO PROVIDE PERSONAL ASSISTANCE SERVICES THAT
ARE PROVIDED THROUGH THE DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES ADMINISTRATION.
(B) (1) A PROVIDER AGENCY SHALL PAY EACH PERSONAL CARE AIDE A
WAGE OF AT LEAST $17 PER HOUR.
(2) A PROVIDER AGENCY SHALL PROVIDE WRITTEN NOTICE TO EACH
PERSONAL CARE AIDE EMPLOYED BY THE PROVIDER AGENCY OF THE WAGE
REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION AND THE RATE THAT THE
PERSONAL CARE AIDE WILL BE PAID.
(3) THE DEPARTMENT MAY REQUEST DOCUMENTATION FROM A
PROVIDER AGENCY TO DEMONSTRATE COMPLIANCE WITH THIS SECTION.
(C) (1) EACH PROVIDER AGENCY SHALL PROVIDE AT LEAST 24 HOURS OF
PAID EARNED SICK AND SAFE LEAVE FOR USE IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 3–1305 OF
THE LABOR AND EMPLOYMENT ARTICLE:
(I) ON JANUARY 1 OF EACH CALENDAR YEAR TO EACH
PERSONAL CARE AIDE EMPLOYED BY THE PROVIDER AGENCY; AND
(II) FOR A PERSONAL CARE AIDE WHO IS HIRED DURING A
CALENDAR YEAR, ON THE PERSONAL CARE AIDE’S FIRST DAY OF EMPLOYMENT.
(2) AFTER A PERSONAL CARE AIDE WHO IS EMPLOYED BY A PROVIDER
AGENCY WORKS 720 HOURS IN A CALENDAR YEAR FOR THE PROVIDER AGENCY, THE
PROVIDER AGENCY SHALL PROVIDE THE PERSONAL CARE AIDE WITH A MINIMUM OF
1 HOUR OF SICK AND SAFE LEAVE PER EVERY 30 HOURS THE PERSONAL CARE AIDE
WORKS.

HOUSE BILL 1129 3
(D) (1) THE DEPARTMENT MAY TAKE APPROPRIATE ENFORCEMENT
ACTION AGAINST A PROVIDER AGENCY IF THE PROVIDER AGENCY FAILS TO COMPLY
WITH THIS SECTION.
(2) APPROPRIATE ENFORCEMENT MAY INCLUDE:
(I) IMPOSITION OF A CORRECTIVE PLAN;
(II) SUSPENSION OR TERMINATION FROM THE PROGRAM; AND
(III) ANY OTHER ACTION DETERMINED APPROPRIATE BY THE
DEPARTMENT.
Article – Labor and Employment
3–1303.
(D) TO THE EXTENT THAT § 15–160 OF THE HEALTH – GENERAL ARTICLE
CONFLICTS WITH THIS SUBTITLE, § 15–160 OF THE HEALTH – GENERAL ARTICLE
SHALL PREVAIL TO THE EXTENT OF THE CONFLICT.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, on or before October 1, 2026,
the Maryland Department of Health shall report to the Senate Finance Committee and the
House Health Committee, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, on
the steps that are necessary to ensure that a minimum of 80% of Medicaid payments for
personal care services is spent on compensation for personal care aides and that personal
care aides receive an hourly wage of at least $20 per hour.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.